Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-885.06
Action for recovery of compensation; prohibited, except to licensed brokers, associate brokers, or salespersons.

No action or suit shall be instituted, nor recovery be had, in any court of this state by any person for compensation for any act done or service rendered, the doing or rendering of which is prohibited under the Nebraska Real Estate License Act to other than licensed brokers, licensed associate brokers, or licensed salespersons. A licensed broker may bring an action in the name of a partnership, limited liability company, or corporation if the broker operates under any of such business organizations.

Laws 1973, LB 68, § 6;

Laws 1978, LB 361, § 2;

Laws 1983, LB 182, § 6;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 531.

Under the current statute, a licensed broker may bring an action under this section even if the partnership or corporation under which he operates is not licensed. Under the previous statute, section 81-885.16, R.R.S.1943, Reissue of 1976, such an action would be barred. Peterson and Vogt v. Livingston, 206 Neb. 753, 295 N.W.2d 106 (1980).